District of Columbia statutes.
2-1565.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Youth” means an individual who is at least 13 years of age and no older than 22 years of age.

(2)

“Youth Council” means the Youth Council of the District of Columbia, established in § 2-1565.02.

History

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-251, § 2, 55 DCR 9247